Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5786.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "enterprise data center construction labor act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Construction" means the construction, erection, reconstruction, alteration, conversion, demolition, repair, moving, or equipping of buildings or structures. (b) "Construction contract" means a contract for the construction of an enterprise data center as described in section 3. (c) "Enterprise data center" means that term as defined in section 4ee of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54ee. (d) "Labor organization" means that term as defined in section 2 of 1939 PA 176, MCL 423.2. (e) "Locality" means the county or prosperity region in which an enterprise data center is located, as determined by the Michigan strategic fund. (f) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic fund as created under section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005. (g) "Registered apprenticeship program" means that term as defined in 29 USC 50c or a program registered with a state apprenticeship agency recognized by the United States Department of Labor. Sec. 3. (1) The owner of an enterprise data center, or the owner's designee, shall not enter into a construction contract for the construction of an enterprise data center unless the construction contract requires that the contractor or subcontractor make a good-faith effort in accordance with this act to do both of the following: (a) Use the following order of priority in recruiting and hiring workers to construct the enterprise data center: (i) Workers who are members of a labor organization in the locality in which the enterprise data center is being constructed. (ii) Workers who are members of a labor organization in this state but outside the locality in which the enterprise data center is being constructed. (iii) Workers who are members of an out-of-state labor organization. (b) Except for a job classification that the Michigan strategic fund determines registered apprentices are not reasonably available to perform, ensure that not less than 10% of the total labor hours performed on the construction of the enterprise data center is performed by apprentices enrolled in a registered apprenticeship program. (2) A contractor or subcontractor subject to a construction contract shall do both of the following: (a) Document the contractor's or subcontractor's good-faith efforts required by the construction contract. (b) Maintain the documents described in subdivision (a) for not less than 3 years after construction of the enterprise data center is complete, or a longer period if prescribed by the Michigan strategic fund. (3) The Michigan strategic fund shall prescribe a manner in which a contractor or subcontractor must maintain a document that evidences the contractor's or subcontractor's good-faith efforts required by a construction contract. (4) The Michigan strategic fund may determine, in writing, that registered apprentices are not reasonably available for 1 or more job classifications during a specified period. Sec. 4. To demonstrate a good-faith effort to hire or recruit workers in the order of priority described in section 3, a contractor or subcontractor shall, at a minimum, do all of the following: (a) Submit a written request for referral of qualified workers to at least 1 labor organization in the locality that customarily supplies workers for the relevant job classification that the contractor or subcontractor is recruiting or hiring. The written request must include the job classification, anticipated start date, expected duration, work location, shift information, pay scale, and number of workers requested. (b) After the contractor or subcontractor submits a request under subdivision (a), wait not less than 3 days for the labor organization to respond to the request. (c) If the labor organization responds to the request that it cannot refer a sufficient number of qualified workers, or if the labor organization does not respond within the 3-day time period, proceed to the next priority level described in section 3. The contractor or subcontractor must maintain the labor organization's response or proof of delivery of the written request, as applicable. (d) If the contractor or subcontractor recruits or hires workers from outside the enterprise data center's locality, maintain documentation that shows why workers were not available from the higher-priority level for that job classification and work period that the contractor or subcontractor is recruiting or hiring for. (e) Document each action described in this section. Sec. 5. An owner of an enterprise data center, or the owner's designee, that enters into a construction contract shall submit, in the form, manner, and frequency prescribed by the Michigan strategic fund, a sworn certification and workforce report that verifies, as determined by the Michigan strategic fund, that the contractor or subcontractor subject to the construction contract is in compliance with the contractual requirements described in section 3 and is demonstrating a good-faith effort under section 4. The workforce report must identify the workforce that the owner uses in the construction of the enterprise data center and include all of the following: (a) The job classification of each worker. (b) The total number of hours worked on the construction of the enterprise data center and the total hours worked by each worker. (c) The recruiting sources that were used to hire the workers. Sec. 6. (1) If the Michigan strategic fund determines that a construction contract violates section 3 or the contractor or subcontractor subject to a construction contract fails to demonstrate a good-faith effort under section 4, the enterprise data center is subject to 1 or both of the following: (a) Being ineligible for the tax exemptions provided under section 4ee of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54ee, and section 4cc of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.94cc. (b) As determined by the Michigan strategic fund, suspension or revocation of a certificate issued by the Michigan strategic fund under section 4ee of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54ee, or section 4cc of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.94cc. (2) If the Michigan strategic fund determines that both of the following events occurred as related to an enterprise data center, the Michigan strategic fund shall notify the department of treasury: (a) One or both of the following violations: (i) The construction contract violates section 3. (ii) The contractor or subcontractor subject to the construction contract fails to demonstrate a good-faith effort under section 4. (b) A tax exemption under 1 or both of the following was applied to the enterprise data center during the time that 1 or both of the violations described in subdivision (a) occurred: (i) Section 4ee of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54ee. (ii) Section 4cc of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.94cc. (3) The Michigan strategic fund may do both of the following to implement the requirements of this section: (a) Audit, inspect, or otherwise review documents that a person is required to maintain under this act to determine compliance with this act. (b) Require a person to submit supplemental workforce reports or documentation that the Michigan strategic fund determines is necessary to determine compliance with this act. Sec. 7. (1) A labor organization in the locality in which an enterprise data center is being constructed, or an individual worker, may submit a complaint to the Michigan strategic fund that the contract for the construction of an enterprise data center violates this act. The complaint must be submitted in writing and have supportive documentation. (2) Upon receipt of a complaint under subsection (1), the Michigan strategic fund may review the complaint and request additional information from the applicable contractor, subcontractor, or owner of the enterprise data center to determine if the construction contract violates this act. Sec. 8. This act must not be construed to do any of the following: (a) Require a person to enter into a project labor agreement. (b) Prohibit the hiring of a worker who is not a member of a labor organization if other workers are not reasonably available under the order of priority described in section 3. (c) Limit the Michigan strategic fund's authority to prescribe forms and reasonable documentation standards to administer this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless both of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5787 (request no. H05629'25). (b) House Bill No. 5785 (request no. H05769'25).